Utah statutes.
26-23-2.   Administrative review of actions of department or director.

Any person aggrieved by any action or inaction of the department or its executive director may request an adjudicative proceeding by following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

